Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

Cable Television Act of 1977

7-59-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Cable Television Act of 1977.”

Acts 1977, ch. 334, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4301.

Cross-References. Film, entertainment and music commission, title 4, ch. 3, part 50.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — First Amendment — Municipal Franchising of Cable Television, 53 Tenn. L. Rev. 179 (1985).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of telephone cooperatives to provide single or two (2) way television services to subscribers, OAG 92-65, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 62 (10/19/92).

Operation of telephone and cable television service by city, OAG 95-097, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 110 (9/18/95).

Collateral References.

Cable television equipment or services as subject to sales or use tax. 5 A.L.R.4th 754.

7-59-102. Part definitions — Franchise licenses.

For purposes of this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cable service” has the same meaning as defined in § 7-59-303;

“Cable service provider” has the same meaning as defined in § 7-59-303;

“Department” has the same meaning as defined in § 7-59-303;

“Video service” has the same meaning as defined in § 7-59-303; and

“Video service provider” has the same meaning as defined in § 7-59-303.

Except with respect to a cable or video service provider that is issued a state-issued certificate of franchise authority by the department pursuant to part 3 of this chapter, the governing body of each municipality in each county in this state has the power and authority to regulate the operation of any cable television company, cable service provider or video service provider that serves customers within its territorial limits, by the issuance of franchise licenses after public notice and showing the terms of any proposed franchise agreement and public initiation for fees and not inconsistent with any rules and regulations of the federal communications commission or § 7-59-304.

Cable television systems shall not serve customers in any unincorporated area without obtaining a franchise from the county or the department, unless the systems were serving those areas under franchises applied for at least ninety (90) days prior to May 18, 1977.

A county shall not issue a franchise that is within any municipality.

A franchise shall not be required for line extensions of a cable television system that do not serve any customers in the unincorporated area through which such lines are extended, or where such line extensions are constructed upon public lands or with easements not obtained from any public body.

The governing body of a county shall not deny any cable television system a franchise for any area in which such cable television system was in place on May 18, 1977, or held a certificate of compliance from the federal communications commission.

Franchises issued by a municipality or a county shall not be inconsistent with the rules and regulations of the federal communications commission.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as prohibiting any county or municipal government from withdrawing a locally issued franchise from a cable television company, cable service provider or video service provider for cause.

A franchise shall not be required of a cable television system to erect any tower or transmission cable in an unincorporated area for the purpose of providing service for an incorporated area.

Any municipal electric system permitted to operate under the authority of chapter 52, part 6 of this title, before delivering any cable services, two-way video transmission or video programming shall obtain a franchise from the appropriate municipal governing body or county governing body.

The franchising authority shall not employ terms more favorable or less burdensome upon a municipal electric system operating under the authority of chapter 52, part 6 of this title than those imposed by the franchising authority upon any private provider's providing the same services within the franchising authority's jurisdiction. The franchising authority shall not impose or enforce any local franchise requirement on any such private provider that is not also made applicable to such a municipal electric system, nor shall the franchising authority discriminate between such providers.

Nothing contained in this section shall be interpreted to limit the authority of a municipality or county to collect franchise fees, control and regulate its streets and public ways, or enforce its powers to provide for the public health, safety, and welfare.

Acts 1977, ch. 334, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-4302; Acts 1999, ch. 481, § 2; 2008, ch. 932, § 20.

Attorney General Opinions. Cable companies' collection of franchise fees, OAG 98-0165, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 165 (8/24/98).

Collateral References.

Community antenna television systems (CATV) as subject to jurisdiction of state public utility or service commission. 61 A.L.R.3d 1150.

Standing to contest award of, or acquisition of right to operate, cable TV certificate, license, or franchise in state court action. 78 A.L.R.3d 1255.

7-59-103. Above and below ground cables — Permits.

Any cable television company, cable service provider or video service provider incorporated under the laws of this state and any other such company incorporated or operating under the laws of any other state, upon complying with the laws of this state regulating the doing of business in this state by foreign corporations or foreign businesses, may, upon approval of the governing body of the city, county or department construct, maintain and operate its cable over or beneath any of the public lands of this state, but not including the freeway system, which is defined as a fully-controlled access facility, or over or beneath or along any of the highways or public roads of the state or over or beneath any of the waters of the state. The cable television company, cable service provider or video service provider shall, unless previously covered by court decree, where possible and practical, enter into an agreement with the telephone company or electric power distribution company whereby the cable television company, cable or video service provider has a right to attach its cable to the poles owned by the telephone company or electric power company or to bury its cables beneath the ground; provided, that the cable is constructed so as not to endanger the safety of persons or to interfere with the use of the public lands, highways or public roads or the navigation of such waters. The agency charged with the maintenance of the public lands, highways, or along the public lands, highways, public roads or waters of the state shall provide that the cable television company, cable or video service provider obtain a permit prior to placing its cables over, under or along the public lands, highways, public roads or waters. If both electrical and telephone facilities in an area are underground, then the cable television, cable service or video service lines in that area shall also be placed underground. If the cable is located in such a manner so as to contribute to interference with the right of ingress or egress to land that is subject to any easement, the cable television company, cable service or video service provider shall obtain the consent of the landowner, the landowner's heirs or assigns from which the original easement was obtained.

Acts 1977, ch. 334, § 2; 1978, ch. 629, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-4303; Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 21.

7-59-104. Relocation of cables and apparatus — Damage to public property.

Whenever the agency charged with the maintenance of such public lands, highways or public roads or waters of the state deems it necessary to move or remove the poles or underground conduit of the telephone company or electric power distribution company, the cable television company, cable service or video service provider and its apparatus shall be moved or removed at the cost of the cable television company, cable or video service provider. Whenever damage results to the public highways or roads as a result of operation by a cable television company, cable service or video service provider, the company or provider shall repair the highway or road according to department standards and all costs shall be borne by the cable television company, cable service or video service provider.

Acts 1977, ch. 334, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-4304; Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 22.

7-59-105. Damage to private property — Underground installation on private property.

No cable television company, cable service provider or video service provider may damage private property on which the utility pole is located without just compensation to the landowner for the damage suffered to the landowner's property.

No cable television company, cable service provider or video service provider may install underground wires or underground equipment on private property without the written consent of the property owner. A violation of this subsection (b) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1977, ch. 334, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-4305; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 2008, ch. 932, § 23.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

7-59-106. Fees payable by companies operating under grandfather clauses.

Any cable television company that shall receive the benefits of operating under the grandfather clauses contained in this part shall pay the county governing body or municipality the same fees as would be charged to a new franchise company by the county or municipality. These fees shall not be inconsistent with the requirements and regulations of the federal communications commission.

Acts 1977, ch. 334, § 6; T.C.A., § 6-4306.

7-59-107. Customer complaints — Records.

Any cable television company, cable service provider or video service provider locally franchised and operating in this state shall maintain a complete service for the purpose of receiving customer complaints concerning service or any other matter relating to its operations. These companies shall keep written records of complaints received, including the name of the complaining party, the nature of the complaint, and the disposition of the complaint. The records shall be subject to inspection by the governing body granting the franchise.

Acts 1977, ch. 334, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-4307; Acts 2008, ch. 932, § 24.

7-59-108. Prohibited activities — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to make or use any unauthorized connection, whether physically, electrically, acoustically, inductively or otherwise, with any part of a franchised cable television system for the purpose of enabling such person, firm, or corporation, or others, to receive or use any television signal, radio signal, picture, program or sound, without payment to the owner of the system.

It is unlawful for any person, without the consent of the franchise owner, to willfully transfer with, remove, or injure in any manner, cables, wires, or equipment used for the distribution of television signals, radio signals, pictures, programs or sound.

Any person who willfully violates this section commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to licensed and certified electrical contractors while performing usual and ordinary service in accordance with recognized standards.

Acts 1977, ch. 334, § 8; T.C.A., § 6-4308; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

7-59-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-59-109 (Acts 1991, ch. 290, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 720, §§ 1, 2), concerning theft of cable television service, is repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 770, § 2, effective July 1, 2004. For provisions concerning communication theft, see §39-14-149.